District of Columbia statutes.
1-605.04

Publication of decisions.

The Board shall cause a copy of each order, decision, or opinion rendered by it to be published in the District of Columbia Register within 60 days of its issuance.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 504, 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Election campaigns, conflict of interest, disclosure, see § 1-1106.02.
Employee deferred compensation programs, collective bargaining agreements, review, see § 47-3601.
Merit system, abolishment of positions for fiscal year 2000, see § 1-624.08.
Merit system, educational service, rules and regulations, see § 1-608.01a.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-605.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-335.4.